Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-560
Deer, antelope, or elk causing damage to property; removal; disposition of carcass.

The commission is authorized, when written request has been filed by the property owner, to remove by any means at any time any deer, antelope, or elk causing damage to real or personal property. If it is necessary to kill any such deer, antelope, or elk to remove the same, the carcass thereof shall first be offered for human consumption. If human consumption is not possible, such carcass may be sold or disposed of in any other manner. The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section.

Laws 1949, c. 103, § 1(2), p. 282;

Laws 1953, c. 124, § 2, p. 390;

Laws 1969, c. 293, § 1, p. 1066;

Laws 1985, LB 557, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 94;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-215.01;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 280;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 83;

Laws 2001, LB 130, § 4.